Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.300

Fiscal responsibilities of state officers and employees—Violations—Civil penalties—Forfeiture.

(1) Where there is reason to believe that a present or former state officer or employee has violated or threatens to violate RCW 43.88.290, the attorney general may initiate an appropriate civil action for the enforcement of RCW 43.88.280 through 43.88.320 or to prevent any such violation. The action may be brought in the county where the alleged violator resides, or the county where the violation is alleged to have occurred or is threatened.

(2) For each violation of RCW 43.88.290 the attorney general shall seek to recover and the court may award the following damages on behalf of the state of Washington:

(a) From each person found in violation of RCW 43.88.290 a civil penalty in the amount of five hundred dollars, or all costs, including reasonable attorney's fees incurred by the state in said action, whichever is greater;

(b) Any damages sustained by the state as a result of the conduct constituting said violation.

In addition to the other penalties contained in this section, judgment against any person, other than an elected official, for violating RCW 43.88.290 may include a declaration of forfeiture of such person's office or employment, to take effect immediately.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 320 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 320: See note following RCW 43.88.280.